Utah statutes.
4-7-6.   Licenses -- Applications.

Application for an agent's, broker's, or dealer's license shall be made to the department upon forms prescribed and furnished by the department.  The application shall state:

(1)  the applicant's name, principal address in this state, and date of birth;

(2)  the applicant's principal address in any location outside Utah;

(3)  the name and principal address of the person authorized by the applicant to accept service of process in this state on behalf of the applicant during the licensure period;

(4)  the name and principal address of the applicant's surety if the application is for a dealer's license;

(5)  a schedule of the commissions, fees, and other charges the applicant intends to collect for services during the period of licensure;

(6)  the name and address of each principal the applicant intends to represent during the period of licensure; and

(7)  any other information that the department may require by rule.

